Utah statutes.
35A-1-104.5.   Strategic plan for health system reform.
The department shall work with the Department of Health, the Insurance
Department, the Governor's Office of Economic Development, and the Legislature
to develop the health system reform in accordance with Title 63M, Chapter 1,
Part 25, Health System Reform Act.
